Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 2
LOCAL DISTRICT COLLEGES - STATE SYSTEM

Editor's note:

This part 2 is similar to part 4 of article 60 of this title as said part 4 existed prior to 1975.

23-71-201. Definitions.

As used in this part 2, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Board" means the state board for community colleges and occupational education created pursuant to section 23-60-104.

"Eligible elector" of a local college district means an elector who has complied with the registration provisions of article 2 of title 1, C.R.S., and who resides within the local college district.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 760, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

(2) R&RE, p. 855, § 31, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(2) amended, p. 858, § 68, effective January 1, 1993.

23-71-202. Joining state system - state support.

Any local college district organized or authorized to be organized under the provisions of this article may apply to the board to become a part of the state system as provided in this part 2; but this subsection (1) shall not apply to any local college district organized on or after December 31, 1967, pursuant to title 22, C.R.S. 1973, or to this title unless the board has approved the district prior to its organization. The application shall include a plan of dissolution and report of finances as required by section 23-71-203 and shall be considered by the board and the Colorado commission on higher education as provided in section 23-71-204.

In advance of entering the state system, local college districts shall receive annually such state support for the education of Colorado resident students as is appropriated for operating purposes.

Any local college district organized or authorized to be organized after July 1, 1967, which is not a part of the state system shall not be eligible to receive any state funds for capital construction purposes unless the board has approved the district prior to its organization.

After the entry of any local college district into the state system, no general property taxes shall be levied for the operational expenses of the local college district; except that a tax levy shall be continued for the purposes of payment of any general obligation of the district, whether bonded indebtedness or otherwise, owed by the district and not assumed by the state.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 760, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

The reference in subsection (1) to "any junior college district organized on or after December 31, 1967, pursuant to title 22, C.R.S. 1973" is to any junior college organized pursuant to article 70 of title 22 prior to its repeal on July 1, 1975.

23-71-203. Submission of plan for joining state system.

Any local college district desiring to become a part of the state system shall use the following procedures: The local district college board of trustees of the district shall submit to the board a plan of dissolution, together with a detailed report of the finances and programs of the existing local district college. The plan of dissolution shall be in such form as may be prescribed by the board. The plan shall provide for the transfer of district assets to the board and shall make provision for meeting all liabilities of the district through assumption by the board or by other lawful means which will not impair existing obligations of contract. Liabilities to be assumed by the board shall include all revenue bonds and other special obligations which by their terms are not payable from revenues derived from ad valorem taxes of the district (such obligations being sometimes collectively designated in this article as "revenue bonds"). The revenue bonds shall continue to be payable from the revenues designated therein and shall not become the general obligation of the board or of the state of Colorado. In each case where there exist outstanding general liabilities at the time of dissolution, the plan shall provide for continuing the tax levy within the boundaries of the dissolved district as may be necessary to retire all general liabilities, including without limitation all general obligation bonded indebtedness, both principal and interest. It is the intention of this part 2 that the general assembly will make timely appropriations for the retirement, and, to the extent moneys are thereby made legally available, the levy shall be diminished or eliminated. Notwithstanding any other provision of this part 2, no local college district shall be dissolved pursuant to this part 2 if, subsequent to May 27, 1967, it has incurred liabilities (evidenced by other than revenue bonds) for capital improvements without the approval of the board prior to the incurrence unless the liabilities have been fully paid as to principal and interest before the dissolution. The plan shall include a timetable for dissolution of the district and estimates of potential enrollment and operating and capital expenditures for a period of five years after dissolution. The date of dissolution and entry into the state system shall be the first day of July immediately following the survey of the dissolution election returns.

If the local district college board of trustees fails to submit a plan of dissolution on its own initiative within five years after May 27, 1967, the eligible electors of the local college district may petition the board of trustees to submit a plan to the board. The petition shall be signed by at least five percent of the eligible electors residing within each county in the local college district and shall be filed with the secretary of the local college district. The signatures need not all be on one sheet of paper, but each sheet shall contain an oath, subscribed to by the person circulating the sheet, that the signatures thereon are genuine. Each person signing the petition shall add to the signature the date of the signing and the elector's place of residence. To the extent practicable, the provisions of article 40 of title 1, C.R.S., regarding circulation of petitions, elector information and signatures on petitions, and affidavits and requirements of circulators of petitions shall apply to petitions under this section.

Upon receipt of the petition, the secretary shall refer the petition to the local district college board of trustees. The board shall, without undue delay, determine if the petition has been signed by the requisite number of eligible electors residing in each county of the local college district. If the petition is found to contain the requisite number of signatures, the board of trustees shall proceed to develop and submit to the board within ninety days a plan of dissolution in accordance with the provisions of subsection (1) of this section. If the petition does not contain the requisite number of signatures, the board of trustees shall make the determination by written resolution.

If a petition and plan of dissolution is submitted pursuant to this section and dissolution of the local college district should not be effected because of rejection or nonapproval of the plan, or otherwise, at any stage of the process provided for by subsection (1) of this section and section 23-71-204, no further petition or plan of dissolution pursuant to this section shall be submitted or accepted for a period of five years from the date of rejection or nonapproval or other action causing the prior plan of dissolution not to be effected.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 760, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 855, § 32, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 858, § 69, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

(2) amended, p. 696, § 3, effective May 4; (2)(c) amended, p. 1798, § 106, effective June 6.

23-71-204. Approval of plan - election.

The board shall review each application for admission to the state system to determine whether the plan and date of entry specified by the local college district will best promote the orderly development of higher education and of the applicant institution. The board shall transmit to the local district college board of trustees any suggested changes in the plan within ninety days after the date of submission.

When the board has approved the plan and date of entry, it shall forward the application to the Colorado commission on higher education for its action. The commission may approve the recommendation of the board. If the commission does not approve the entry into the state system, the board may require a joint meeting of the board and the commission to hear the reasons and to explain the position taken by the board. After review, the commission may reaffirm its position or take such other action as it deems appropriate. The board shall notify the local district college board of trustees of any action taken by the commission under this subsection (2).

(2.5) After the Colorado commission on higher education has approved the recommendation of the board, it shall forward such recommendation to the general assembly. If the general assembly, acting by bill, approves the entry of the district into the state system, the local district college board of trustees may call a special election pursuant to subsection (4) of this section. If the general assembly does not so approve such entry, it shall be deemed rejected, and the district shall not become a part of the state system.

Except to the extent inconsistent with this part 2, the dissolution election shall be called, held, and canvassed by the board of trustees in substantially the same manner as provided for elections authorizing the issuance of local college district general obligation bonds.

When the Colorado commission on higher education, the board, and the general assembly have approved the application, the board of trustees shall call a special election at which only eligible electors of the district may vote. The question shall be:

If a majority of the eligible electors voting vote "yes", the board of trustees and the board shall proceed with the transfer of all assets to the board and with all necessary steps to meet liabilities pursuant to the approved plan. If revenue bonds of the district remain outstanding or unpaid, the board as successor to the board of trustees and to the district shall continuously operate the college, pay principal and interest, and do all things in such manner as to fulfill the obligations of the district under existing resolutions and instruments constituting contracts among the district and bondholders and other contracting parties. Nothing in this part 2 shall impair or authorize the impairment of any obligation of contract. The board shall serve ex officio as the board of trustees of the district until all existing general liabilities, including without limitation all general obligation bonded indebtedness and the interest thereon but not including revenue bonds, are paid, and, except as provided in this part 2, the levy required for the payment shall continue until the payment is made in full. General obligation bonds of a dissolved district may be refunded in the manner provided in part 6 of this article.

Shall the _______ local college district be dissolved, all assets transferred to the state board for community colleges and occupational education and provision made for meeting all liabilities as provided in the plan of dissolution by _______(date)?
Yes ___ No ___.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 761, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(2.5) added and (4) amended, p. 789, § 1, effective May 3.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 856, § 33, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(4) and (5) amended, p. 860, § 70, effective January 1, 1993.

23-71-205. Withdrawal from state system.

Any community college may withdraw from the state system and establish a local college district pursuant to procedures established by the Colorado commission on higher education. The procedures shall provide for a vote by the eligible electors of the area proposed to be incorporated into a local college district. The Colorado commission on higher education shall provide for the transfer of college property and liabilities to the district in the event of such a withdrawal and establishment.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire section added, p. 767, § 20, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 860, § 71, effective January 1, 1993.

23-71-206. Northeastern junior college - approval of plan - date of entry into state system - continuation of mill levy.

The general assembly hereby approves the plan of dissolution submitted by Northeastern junior college pursuant to section 23-71-203, referred to in this section as the "plan". Contingent upon approval of the plan in a special election held pursuant to section 23-71-204 and enactment of an appropriation of general fund moneys to the board for allocation to Northeastern junior college, whether in an annual general appropriations bill or by supplemental appropriation, the general assembly approves the entry of Northeastern junior college into the state system of community and technical colleges.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 23-71-204 (4), at the special election for approval of the plan, the question shall be:

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 23-71-203 (1), if the plan is approved and moneys are appropriated as provided in subsection (1) of this section, Northeastern junior college shall enter the state system of community and technical colleges on the effective date of the appropriation, but the Northeastern junior college district shall continue as provided in subsection (3) of this section. On entry into the state system of community and technical colleges, Northeastern junior college shall be under the management and control of the board. On entry into the state system of community and technical colleges, the assets and liabilities of Northeastern junior college, with the exception of the property tax moneys collected and the physical education and events center built pursuant to subsection (3) of this section and the property on which said center is located, shall be transferred to the board; except that, if construction of the physical education and events center is completed prior to approval of the plan and appropriation of moneys pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the physical education and events center and the property on which said center is located shall be transferred to the board at the time Northeastern junior college enters the state system of community and technical colleges.

If the plan is approved and moneys are appropriated as provided in subsection (1) of this section, the Northeastern junior college district shall be dissolved three years after Northeastern junior college enters the state system of community and technical colleges. Prior to dissolution of the Northeastern junior college district and notwithstanding any other provisions of this part 2 to the contrary, the Northeastern junior college district shall continue to collect property tax in the district. Following approval of the plan, the mill levy imposed by the Northeastern junior college district shall not exceed the mill levy imposed for the tax year during which the plan is approved and may be reduced prior to dissolution of the district.

Northeastern junior college district shall use a portion of the property tax moneys collected pursuant to this subsection (3) for construction of a physical education and events center on the Northeastern junior college campus, as provided in the plan; except that, if construction of the physical education and events center is completed prior to the time that the plan is approved and moneys are appropriated as provided in subsection (1) of this section, all of the property tax moneys collected pursuant to this subsection (3) shall be used as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection (3).

Northeastern junior college district shall use the property tax moneys collected pursuant to this subsection (3) that are not used for construction of the physical education and events center on the Northeastern junior college campus to assist residents of the Northeastern junior college district who are enrolled at Northeastern junior college in defraying any increases in tuition that may result from entry into the state system of community and technical colleges.

On dissolution of the Northeastern junior college district, the physical education and events center built pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection (3), regardless of whether said center is completed, the property on which said center is located, and any moneys remaining under control of the district shall be transferred to the board.

Shall Northeastern junior college join the state system of community and technical colleges upon enactment of an appropriation to fund Northeastern junior college as part of the state system of community and technical colleges, and shall the Northeastern junior college district continue to collect property taxes for three years after the appropriation is enacted in the amount of 20.311 mills in year one, 18.000 mills in year two, and 16.000 mills in year three, after which time the Northeastern junior college district shall be dissolved, all assets be transferred to the state board for community colleges and occupational education, and provision be made for meeting all liabilities as provided in the plan of dissolution?
Yes ___ No ___.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire section added, p. 1040, § 1, effective May 23.

23-71-207. Colorado Northwestern community college - approval of plan - date of entry into system - continuation of mill levy.

The general assembly hereby approves the plan submitted by Colorado Northwestern community college pursuant to section 23-71-203, referred to in this section as the "plan". Contingent upon approval of the plan at the November 1998 general election and enactment of an appropriation of general fund moneys to the board for allocation to Colorado Northwestern community college, whether in an annual general appropriations bill or by supplemental appropriation, the general assembly approves the entry of Colorado Northwestern community college into the state system of community and technical colleges.

Notwithstanding the provisions of sections 23-71-202 (4) and 23-71-204 (4), the ballot question submitted to the voters of the Rangely junior college district for the approval of the plan at the 1998 general election shall be:

At the 1998 general election, the voters of the Moffat county affiliated junior college district shall decide the following question:

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 23-71-203 (1), if the plan is approved by a majority of the voters in the Rangely junior college district and if moneys are appropriated as provided in subsection (1) of this section, Colorado Northwestern community college shall enter the state system of community and technical colleges on the effective date of the appropriation. The Rangely junior college district shall continue as provided in subsection (3) of this section. If a majority of the voters of the Moffat county affiliated junior college district approve the measure set forth in subparagraph (II) of paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of this section, the Moffat county affiliated junior college district shall continue as provided in subsection (4) of this section.

Upon entry into the state system of community and technical colleges:

Colorado Northwestern community college shall be under the management and control of the board;

The assets and liabilities of Colorado Northwestern community college shall be transferred to the board in accordance with the plan; and

The educational facilities of Colorado Northwestern community college shall be immediately eligible for state controlled maintenance funds.

All assets and liabilities of the Rangely junior college district shall be transferred to the board; except that the outstanding general obligation bonds and associated debt service assets and liabilities of the Rangely junior college district in existence as of June 30, 1999, shall remain with such district and the Rangely junior college district shall administer the mill levy for the retirement of said bonds pursuant to section 23-71-204 (5);

Notwithstanding section 23-71-122, the Rangely junior college district board of trustees has only the powers necessary to levy taxes and distribute the revenues generated therefrom in accordance with the purposes listed in subsection (3)(a)(III) of this section and the powers enumerated in section 23-71-122 (1)(b), (1)(d), (1)(h), (1)(k), (1)(m), (1)(n), and (1)(q);

The Rangely junior college district board of trustees shall not have employees;

Notwithstanding section 23-71-123, the Rangely junior college district board of trustees has only the duty to prepare and adopt a budget pursuant to part 1 of article 44 of title 22 and any additional duties enumerated in the plan;

The Rangely junior college district board of trustees is authorized to execute any instrument necessary to convey title for the Rangely campus of Colorado Northwestern community college to the board; and

The Rangely junior college district board of trustees continues to consist of five members elected by voters in the Rangely junior college district who serve four-year staggered terms, with a limit of two consecutive terms. The board is subject to the requirements of the "Colorado Open Records Act", part 2 of article 72 of title 24, and the open meetings law, part 4 of article 6 of title 24.

In the 1998 general election, voters of the Rangely junior college district approved a plan for Colorado Northwestern community college to join the state system for community colleges and occupational education, the collection of up to five mills of property taxes, and the indefinite continuation of Rangely junior college district with the following authority:

(I) The Rangely junior college district remains in existence but not as a local college district under this article 71;

(II) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part 2 to the contrary, the Rangely junior college district shall continue to collect property tax and specific ownership tax in the district. The Rangely junior college district in December, 1999, shall initially levy five mills for the purposes specified in subparagraph (III) of this paragraph (a) in addition to the mill levy required for debt service on outstanding general obligation bonds previously approved by voters;

(III) The Rangely junior college district shall use the revenues collected pursuant to this subsection (3), other than those collected for outstanding general obligation bonds previously approved, to:

Assist residents of the Rangely junior college district who are enrolled at Colorado Northwestern community college in defraying increases in tuition that may result from entry into the state system of community and technical colleges;

Provide supplemental funding to the state for the operating costs of current or future programs offered by Colorado Northwestern community college;

Erect new or renovate existing facilities for Colorado Northwestern community college; and

Provide capital funding for technology enhancement and supplemental equipment for Colorado Northwestern community college;

Upon the future dissolution of the Rangely junior college district, any assets remaining as of the date of dissolution shall be transferred to the board.

In the 1998 general election, voters of the Moffat county affiliated junior college district approved a plan for Colorado Northwestern community college to join the state system for community colleges and occupational education, the collection of up to three mills of property taxes through the 2008 property tax year, and the dissolution of the Moffat county affiliated junior college district on January 1, 2009. In the 2006 general election, pursuant to subsection (5) of this section, voters of the Moffat county affiliated junior college district approved the collection of up to three mills of property taxes and the indefinite continuation of the Moffat county affiliated junior college district. The Moffat county affiliated junior college district shall use the tax money collected pursuant to this subsection (4)(a)(I) to:
(4) (a) (I) In the 1998 general election, voters of the Moffat county affiliated junior college district approved a plan for Colorado Northwestern community college to join the state system for community colleges and occupational education, the collection of up to three mills of property taxes through the 2008 property tax year, and the dissolution of the Moffat county affiliated junior college district on January 1, 2009. In the 2006 general election, pursuant to subsection (5) of this section, voters of the Moffat county affiliated junior college district approved the collection of up to three mills of property taxes and the indefinite continuation of the Moffat county affiliated junior college district. The Moffat county affiliated junior college district shall use the tax money collected pursuant to this subsection (4)(a)(I) to:

Assist residents of the Moffat county affiliated junior college district who are enrolled at Colorado Northwestern community college in defraying increases in tuition that may result from entry into the state system of community and technical colleges;

Provide supplemental funding to the state for the operating costs of current or future programs offered by Colorado Northwestern community college;

Erect new or renovate existing facilities for Colorado Northwestern community college;

Provide capital funding for technology enhancement and supplemental equipment for Colorado Northwestern community college; and

Provide for the operating costs of the facilities owned by the Moffat county affiliated junior college district.

The Moffat county affiliated junior college district is not a local college district under this article 71 and the Moffat county affiliated junior college district board has only the powers necessary to levy taxes and distribute the revenues generated therefrom in accordance with the purposes listed in subsection (4)(a)(I) of this section.

The Moffat county affiliated junior college district board shall not have employees.

All assets and liabilities of the Moffat county affiliated junior college district are transferred to the board except the revenues generated pursuant to subsection (4)(a)(I) of this section, those assets specified in the plan, and revenues generated from certain real estate owned by the Moffat county affiliated junior college district as of January 1, 2019.

Repealed.

The Moffat county affiliated junior college district board had the authority to convey a certain parcel of land to the board for the Craig campus on January 11, 2010, and has the authority to execute any instrument necessary to quiet title to that parcel.

The Moffat county affiliated junior college district board has the authority to hold and sell land in its ownership as of January 1, 2009, so long as the sale of any land satisfies the following requirements:

The sale is for at least a fair market value as determined by an independent appraiser; and

Proceeds from the sale are used in accordance with subsection (4)(a)(I) of this section.

The Moffat county affiliated junior college district board continues to consist of five members elected by voters in the Moffat county affiliated junior college district who serve four-year staggered terms, with a limit of two consecutive terms. The board is subject to the requirements of the "Colorado Open Records Act", part 2 of article 72 of title 24, and the open meetings law, part 4 of article 6 of title 24.

Repealed.

At the 2006 general election, the voters of the Moffat county affiliated junior college district shall decide the following question:

If the ballot question set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection (5) is rejected by the voters at the 2006 general election, the Moffat county affiliated junior college district board may resubmit the ballot question set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection (5) to the voters of the Moffat county affiliated junior college district in the 2007 general election. If the ballot question set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection (5) is rejected by the voters at the 2006 or 2007 general election, the Moffat county affiliated junior college district board may resubmit the ballot question set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection (5) to the voters of the Moffat county affiliated junior college district in the 2008 general election.

If a majority of voters of the Moffat county affiliated junior college district approve the measure set forth in subsection (5)(a) of this section, then, notwithstanding subsection (4)(a)(I) of this section, the Moffat county affiliated junior college district shall not dissolve on January 1, 2009, but shall continue to exist and shall continue to collect property tax in the initial amount of three mills. The Moffat county affiliated junior college district shall use the property tax money collected pursuant to this subsection (5)(c) as provided in subsections (4)(a)(I)(A) to (4)(a)(I)(E) of this section.

If a majority of the voters of the Moffat county affiliated junior college district approve the measure set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection (5), the Moffat county affiliated junior college district board shall continue to exist subject to the restrictions specified in subparagraphs (II) and (III) of paragraph (a) of subsection (4) of this section.

If a majority of the voters of the Moffat county affiliated junior college district do not approve the measure set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection (5), then the Moffat county affiliated junior college district shall dissolve on January 1, 2009, as provided in subparagraphs (I) and (V) of paragraph (a) of subsection (4) of this section.

Shall Colorado Northwestern community college join the state system of community and technical colleges upon enactment of an appropriation to fund Colorado Northwestern community college as a part of the state system of community and technical colleges, and shall the Rangely junior college district continue to collect property taxes after the appropriation is enacted in the amount of five mills, until such time as the Rangely junior college district board and the voters of the Rangely junior college district approve an increase in the mill levy, for tuition, supplemental program funding, and capital construction purposes plus the mill levy required for the continuation of the debt service on outstanding general obligation bonds previously approved by voters, and shall all assets be transferred to the state board for community colleges and occupational education, and provision be made for meeting all liabilities as provided in the plan?
Yes ___ No ___.

If the majority of the voters of the Rangely junior college district approve Colorado Northwestern community college joining the state system of community and technical colleges and an appropriation is enacted for such purpose, shall the Moffat county affiliated junior college district, as part of the area served by Colorado Northwestern community college pursuant to the plan, continue to collect property taxes through the 2008 property tax year in the amount of three mills, until such time as the Moffat county affiliated junior college district board and the voters of the Moffat county affiliated junior college district approve an increase in the mill levy, for tuition, supplemental program funding, and capital construction purposes?
Yes ___ No ___.

Shall the Moffat county affiliated junior college district, as part of the area served by Colorado Northwestern community college, continue indefinitely to collect property taxes in the amount of up to three mills, until such time as the Moffat county affiliated junior college district board and the voters of the Moffat county affiliated junior college district approve an increase in the mill levy, for tuition, supplemental program funding, and capital construction purposes?
Yes ___ No ___.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire section added, p. 897, § 1, effective May 26.

L. 2006:

(5) added, p. 162, § 1, effective March 31.

L. 2020:

IP(3)(a), (3)(a)(I), (3)(a)(III)(C), (3)(a)(V), (3)(a)(VI), (3)(a)(VII), IP(4)(a)(I), (4)(a)(I)(C), (4)(a)(II), (4)(a)(III), (4)(a)(IV), and (5)(c) amended, (3)(a)(VIII), (3)(a)(IX), (4)(a)(VI), (4)(a)(VII), and (4)(a)(VIII) added, and (4)(a)(V) and (4)(b) repealed, (HB 20-1067), ch. 47, p. 161, § 1, effective September 14.

23-71-208. Colorado Northwestern community college - disposal of assets.

Any aircraft or other equipment used by the Colorado Northwestern community college in its aviation-related programs may be disposed of by the state board for community colleges and occupational education, created in section 23-60-104, by sale, trade, or other method of disposal. Any proceeds from the disposal of such aircraft shall be the property of the state board for community colleges and occupational education for the use and benefit of Colorado Northwestern community college. The disposal of such aircraft or equipment shall be exempt from section 17-24-106.6, C.R.S., relating to surplus state property and any rules promulgated thereunder.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 163, § 2, effective March 31.